Utah statutes.
62A-15-603.   Administration of state hospital -- Division -- Authority.

(1)  The administration of the state hospital is vested in the division where it shall function and be administered as a part of the state's comprehensive mental health program and, to the fullest extent possible, shall be coordinated with local mental health authority programs.  When it becomes feasible the board may direct that the hospital be decentralized and administered at the local level by being integrated with, and becoming a part of, the community mental health services.

(2)  The division shall succeed to all the powers, discharge all the duties, and perform all the functions, duties, rights, and responsibilities pertaining to the state hospital which by law are conferred upon it or required to be discharged or performed.  However, the functions, powers, duties, rights, and responsibilities of the division and of the board otherwise provided by law and by this part apply.

(3)  Supervision and administration of security responsibilities for the state hospital is vested in the division.  The executive director shall designate, as special function officers, individuals to perform special security functions for the state hospital that require peace officer authority.  These special function officers may not become or be designated as members of the Public Safety Retirement System.

(4)  Directors of mental health facilities that house involuntary detainees or detainees committed pursuant to judicial order may establish secure areas, as prescribed in Section 76-8-311.1, within the mental health facility for the detainees.

